Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Article 6 Documentation by Home Inspectors

8-3-330.
“Home inspector” defined.

As used in this article, the term “home inspector” means any person, except an employee of a county, municipality, or political subdivision while engaged in the performance of the duties of his or her employment, who, for consideration, inspects and reports on the condition of any home or single-family dwelling or the grounds, roof, exterior surface, garage or carport, structure, attic, basement or crawl space, electrical system, heating system, air-conditioning system, plumbing, on-site sewerage disposal, pool or hot tub, fireplace, kitchen, appliances, or any combination thereof for a prospective purchaser or seller.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-330

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 471, § 1.

8-3-331.
Documentation required.

Every home inspector shall provide to the person on whose behalf a home or single-family dwelling is being inspected a written document specifying:

The scope of the inspection, including those structural elements, systems, and subsystems to be inspected;

That the inspection is a visual inspection; and

That the home inspector will notify in writing the person on whose behalf such inspection is being made of any defects noted during the inspection, along with any recommendation that certain experts be retained to determine the extent and corrective action necessary for such defects.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-331

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 471, § 1.

8-3-331.1.
Licensing authority of political subdivision.

Nothing in this article shall preempt a political subdivision from prescribing licensing requirements for home inspectors.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-331.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 550, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 550, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that no county or municipality shall be required to implement the requirements of that Act until such time as the county or municipality has consumed all building permit forms on hand as of January 1, 1998.

8-3-332.
Criminal penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-332

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 471, § 1.